Utah statutes.
31A-22-315.   Motor vehicle insurance reporting -- Penalty.
(1) (a)  As used in this section, "commercial motor vehicle insurance
coverage" means an insurance policy that:
(i)  includes motor vehicle liability coverage, uninsured motorist coverage,
underinsured motorist coverage, or personal injury coverage; and
(ii)  is defined by the department.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department shall make rules defining commercial motor vehicle
insurance coverage.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsections (2)(b) and (c), each insurer that
issues a policy that includes motor vehicle liability coverage, uninsured
motorist coverage, underinsured motorist coverage, or personal injury coverage
under this part shall before the seventh and twenty-first day of each calendar
month provide to the Department of Public Safety's designated agent selected
in accordance with Title 41, Chapter 12a, Part 8, Uninsured Motorist
Identification Database Program, a record of each motor vehicle insurance
policy in effect for vehicles registered or garaged in Utah as of the previous
submission that was issued by the insurer.
(b)  Each insurer that issues commercial motor vehicle insurance coverage
shall before the seventh day of each calendar month provide to the Department
of Public Safety's designated agent selected in accordance with Title 41,
Chapter 12a, Part 8, Uninsured Motorist Identification Database Program, a
record of each commercial motor vehicle insurance policy in effect for
vehicles registered or garaged in Utah as of the previous month that was
issued by the insurer.
(c)  An insurer that issues a policy that includes motor vehicle liability
coverage, uninsured motorist coverage, underinsured motorist coverage, or
personal injury coverage under this part is not required to provide a record
of a motor vehicle insurance policy in effect for a vehicle to the Department
of Public Safety's designated agent under Subsection (2)(a) or (b) if the
policy covers a vehicle that is registered under Section 41-1a-221, 41-1a-222,
or 41-1a-301.
(d)  This Subsection (2) does not preclude more frequent reporting.
(3) (a)  A record provided by an insurer under Subsection (2)(a) shall
include:
(i)  the name, date of birth, and driver license number, if the insured
provides a driver license number to the insurer, of each insured owner or
operator, and the address of the named insured;
(ii)  the make, year, and vehicle identification number of each insured
vehicle; and
(iii)  the policy number, effective date, and expiration date of each policy.
(b)  A record provided by an insurer under Subsection (2)(b) shall include:
(i)  the named insured;
(ii)  the policy number, effective date, and expiration date of each policy;
and
(iii)  the following information, if available:
(A)  the name, date of birth, and driver license number of each insured owner
or operator, and the address of the named insured; and
(B)  the make, year, and vehicle identification number of each insured
vehicle.
(4)  Each insurer shall provide this information by an electronic means or by
another form the Department of Public Safety's designated agent agrees to
accept.
(5) (a)  The commissioner may, following procedures set forth in Title 63G,
Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, assess a fine against an insurer of
up to $250 for each day the insurer fails to comply with this section.
(b)  If an insurer shows that the failure to comply with this section was
inadvertent, accidental, or the result of excusable neglect, the commissioner
shall excuse the fine.
